Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-507
Mentally and physically handicapped children; Department of Health and Human Services; duties.

The Department of Health and Human Services, on behalf of mentally and physically handicapped children, shall (1) obtain admission to state and other suitable schools, hospitals, or other institutions or care in their own homes or in family, free, or boarding homes for such children in accordance with the provisions of the existing law, (2) maintain medical supervision over such mentally or physically handicapped children, and (3) provide necessary medical or surgical care in a suitable hospital, sanitarium, preventorium, or other institution or in the child's own home or a home for any medically handicapped child needing such care and pay for such care from public funds, if necessary.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 30, § 7, p. 184;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 43-507;

R.S.1943, § 43-507;

Laws 1965, c. 243, § 1, p. 693;

Laws 1967, c. 251, § 2, p. 662;

Laws 1988, LB 790, § 27;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 153;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 112.